Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 1. Limited Partnership Act of 1971

§§ 17-14-101 through 17-14-131.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 3.

Cross references. —

For Uniform Limited Partnership Act, see §§

17-14-201

through

17-14-1104

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections derived from Laws 1971, ch. 86, §§ 1 through 31.